Washington statutes.
RCW 23B.25.070

Shares—Represented by certificate—Not represented by certificate.

(1) Shares issued by a social purpose corporation may but need not be represented by certificates.

(2) If shares are represented by certificates, in addition to the information required on certificates by RCW 23B.06.250 (2) and (3), each share certificate must state on its face the following language in a conspicuous manner:

"This entity is a social purpose corporation organized under Title 23B RCW of the Washington business corporation act. The articles of incorporation of this corporation state one or more social purposes of this corporation. The corporation will furnish the shareholder this information without charge on request in writing."

(3) If shares are not represented by certificates, within a reasonable time after the issue or transfer of such shares, the corporation shall deliver to the shareholder a written statement of the information required on certificates pursuant to RCW 23B.06.260(2) and the language required on certificates by subsection (2) of this section.

[ 2020 c 57 s 78; 2012 c 215 s 8.]